Mississippi statutes. Title 55. Parks and Recreation
Chapter 17. International Gardens of Mississippi

§ 55-17-1.
Establishment of gardens authorized; financial aid.

There is hereby authorized to be established the International Gardens of Mississippi which shall be situated in Copiah County, Mississippi, on lands selected by the Joint Legislative International Gardens Commission created by House Concurrent Resolution No. 61 of the 1970 Regular Legislative Session. The site chosen shall be purchased by and the International Gardens of Mississippi shall be developed and maintained with funds to be furnished by the county or counties involved.

The Mississippi Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks shall, in the development of said gardens, abide by the intent of House Concurrent Resolution No. 121 of the 1968 Regular Legislative Session, the intent and recommendations and reports of the Joint Legislative International Gardens Commission, and the final report concerning the proposed gardens as prepared by Mississippi State University for the Legislature wherever reasonable, practical and possible.

The Mississippi Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks may accept financial aid from the United States government, foundations, organizations, and public and private corporations unless expressly forbidden by the laws of the State of Mississippi. Aid, assistance, advice and gifts may be accepted from foreign nations or other states of the United States.

However, until completion of the improvements to the existing state parks designated in House Bill 660, Regular Session of 1972, no funds made available to the State of Mississippi under the Federal Land and Water Conservation Act of 1965 shall be used in the International Gardens of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5977.5-31; Laws, 1972, ch. 340, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 124, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 30, 2000.).

§ 55-17-3.
Special advisory committee.

A special advisory committee for the International Gardens of Mississippi is hereby created which shall consist of two (2) members of the Department of Horticulture of Mississippi State University, as selected by the president of Mississippi State University, three (3) members of the senate to be appointed by the lieutenant governor, three (3) members of the house of representatives to be appointed by the speaker of the house, and four (4) members to be appointed by the Governor, one (1) of whom shall be a resident of each of the supreme court districts and one (1) of whom shall be a resident of Copiah County. At least one (1) of the members of the committee shall be a woman. The terms of office of the legislative members shall be concurrent with the term of office for which they were elected. The term of office of the official nonlegislative appointees shall terminate on January 1, 1977, and the terms of office of their successor shall terminate on January 1 every four (4) years thereafter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5958-08 (last ¶); Laws, 1972, ch. 340, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved April 19, 1972).

§ 55-17-5.
Park director.

The Mississippi Commission on Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks shall appoint, with the approval of the special advisory committee for the International Gardens of Mississippi, as established by Section 55-17-3, a Park Director of the International Gardens of Mississippi, who shall have administrative and supervisory authority of said gardens, under the general supervision and direction of the Mississippi Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5958-02(g); Laws, 1972, ch. 340, § 3; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 125, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 30, 2000.).